District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.15

Right-of-way over Michigan Avenue to Washington Railway and Electric Company.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized, upon the straightening and shortening of Michigan Avenue as provided by §§ 9-101.15 and 9-105.01 to 9-105.04, to do any and all acts which may be necessary to give the Washington Railway and Electric Company such easement or right-of-way over said Michigan Avenue as is necessary for the proper operation of the railway lines and cars of said company over said avenue as straightened and shortened by the provisions of said sections.

Mar. 4, 1929, 45 Stat. 1545, ch. 682, § 7
This section is referenced in § 9-105.04.
1981 Ed., § 7-131.
1973 Ed., § 7-131.
Consolidation of transit companies: The Washington Railway and Electric Company and the Capital Traction Company were consolidated under the name of Capital Transit Company by the Act of January 14, 1933, 47 Stat. 752, ch. 10, § 1.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia. respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.